North Dakota, session 69, HB1375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 5-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Evidence of an individual under twenty - one years of age in a licensed premises - Proof of
identification - Refusal - Penalty .
1. If a peace officer has reasonable and articulable suspicion that an individual under the age of
twenty - one is in a licensed premises for a purpose prohibited under section 5 - 02 - 06, the
peace officer may request the individual to furnish a nondriver photo identification card or an
operator's license to verify the individual's age.
2. An individual who refuses to provide proof of identification upon request is guilty of an
infraction.
3. If an individual charged with an infraction under this section produces a nondriver photo
identification card or an operator's license before the final disposition of the infraction
establishing the individual was twenty - one years of age or older at the time of the peace
officer's request to furnish identification, the prosecuting attorney shall dismiss the infraction
against the individual.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 5-02-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
5-02-10. Hearing on alleged violations.
Any
1. If a person havinghas information that a licensed retailer of alcoholic beverages has violated
any provisionsprovision of this title, the person may file with the attorney general, city attorney,
or state's attorney an affidavit specifically setting forth suchexplaining the violation within
fourteen days of the date of the alleged violation. Upon receipt of such
2. If a person timely files an affidavit under subsection 1 , the city attorney or state's attorney shall
set the matter for hearing not later than the next regular meeting of the local governing body or
forward suchthe affidavit to the attorney general. Upon receipt of any such
3. If a person timely files an affidavit under subsection 1 , the attorney general shall set the matter
for hearing in the local county courthouse not less than ten days after copies of the affidavit
and notice of hearing have been mailed to the licensee by registered mail.
4. If the hearing is held by the local governing body, a copy of thisthe affidavit and notice of
hearing must be mailed to the licensee by registered mail not less than five days before
suchthe hearing.

H. B. NO. 1375 - PAGE 2
5. A record of such hearings will be madehearing conducted under this section must be recorded
by stenographic notes or the use of an electronic recording device.

H. B. NO. 1375 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1375.
House Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 9 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State